test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nov_2016_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol: Morph
  xerox:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst: Morph
      lookup: App

Tests:

# words where several phonological rules interact

  Nouns:
    idu+N+Sg+Nom: idu
    idu+N+Sg+Gen: [eo, idu]
    ligu+N+Sg+Nom: ligu
    ligu+N+Sg+Gen: leo
    ligu+N+Sg+Ill: likku
    riie+N+Sg+Nom: riie
    riie+N+Sg+Gen: riide
    saag+N+Sg+Nom: saag
    saag+N+Sg+Gen: sae
    viga+N+Sg+Nom: viga
    viga+N+Sg+Gen: vea
    viga+N+Pl+Par: vigu
    pood+N+Sg+Nom: pood
    pood+N+Sg+Gen: poe
    pood+N+Pl+Par: poode

    sai+N+Sg+Nom: sai
    sai+N+Sg+Gen: saia
    sai+N+Sg+Par: saia
    sai+N+Pl+Par: saiu
